Maryland, session 2025, HB1358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1358*

HOUSE BILL 1358
Article – Correctional Services
3–401.
In this subtitle, “program” means a home detention program established under this
subtitle.
3–409.
(a) (1) An incarcerated individual who willfully violates the conditions of the
incarcerated individual’s placement in the program is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 1 year.
(2) Notwithstanding § 9–104 of this article, a sentence under this
subsection may be to the jurisdiction of the Division.
(3) THE DIVISION MAY NOT APPLY CREDIT FOR ANY PORTION OF THE
TIME SERVED IN THE PROGRAM TOWARD ANY SENTENCE OF AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
Article – Criminal Procedure
5–213.
(a) A court may issue a bench warrant for the arrest of a defendant who violates
a condition of pretrial release.
(b) (1) After a defendant is presented before a court, the court may:
[(1)] (I) revoke the defendant’s pretrial release; or
[(2)] (II) continue the defendant’s pretrial release with or without
conditions.
(2) THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER THE NATURE AND CIRCUMSTANCES
OF ANY PENDING CASES OF A DEFENDANT IN DETERMINING THE APPROPRIATE
CONDITIONS OF PRETRIAL RELEASE.
6–218.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) a parolee who is returned to the custody of the Division of Correction
because of a subsequent crime and is confined before being sentenced for the subsequent
crime; OR

HOUSE BILL 1358 3
(2) A DEFENDANT WHO WAS PLACED ON HOME DETENTION AS A
CONDITION OF PRETRIAL RELEASE AND IS RETURNED TO THE CUSTODY OF A
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY FOR VIOLATING A CONDITION OF PRETRIAL RELEASE.
(b) (1) A defendant who is convicted and sentenced shall receive credit against
and a reduction of the term of a definite or life sentence, or the minimum and maximum
terms of an indeterminate sentence, for all time spent in the custody of a correctional
facility, hospital, facility for persons with mental disorders, or other unit because of:
(i) the charge for which the sentence is imposed; or
(ii) the conduct on which the charge is based.
(2) If a defendant is in custody because of a charge that results in a
dismissal or acquittal, the time that would have been credited if a sentence had been
imposed shall be credited against any sentence that is based on a charge for which a
warrant or commitment was filed during that custody.
(3) In a case other than a case described in paragraph (2) of this subsection,
the sentencing court may apply credit against a sentence for time spent in custody for
another charge or crime.
(c) A defendant whose sentence is set aside because of a direct or collateral attack
and who is reprosecuted or resentenced for the same crime or for another crime based on
the same transaction shall receive credit against and a reduction of the term of a definite
or life sentence, or the minimum and maximum terms of an indeterminate sentence, for all
time spent in custody under the prior sentence, including credit applied against the prior
sentence in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
(d) A defendant who is serving multiple sentences, one of which is set aside as the
result of a direct or collateral attack, shall receive credit against and a reduction of the
remaining term of a definite or life sentence, or the remaining minimum and maximum
terms of an indeterminate sentence, for all time spent in custody under the sentence set
aside, including credit applied against the sentence set aside in accordance with subsection
(b) of this section.
(e) (1) The court shall award the credit required by this section at the time of
sentencing.
(2) After having communicated with the parties, the court shall tell the
defendant and shall state on the record the amount of the credit and the facts on which the
credit is based.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.